Louisiana, session 2026, HB1041.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part IX of Chapter 5-G of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 40:1300.81 through 1300.86, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IX. LOUISIANA MEDICAL FREEDOM ACT
§1300.81. Short title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Medical
Freedom Act".
§1300.82. Purpose
The purpose of this Part is to protect the right of individuals to make
autonomous decisions regarding medical interventions without discrimination,
coercion, or exclusion by public entities.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-716 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1041
§1300.83. Definitions
As used in this Section, the following terms have the meanings ascribed to
them:
(1) "Business entity" means any individual or group engaged in any activity,
profession, or enterprise for gain, benefit, or livelihood, whether for-profit or
nonprofit, including self-employed individuals, corporations, partnerships, limited
liability companies, trusts, or any entity registered, licensed, or authorized to operate
in this state.
(2) "Government entity" means any state, parish, municipal, or local
government or any political subdivision, including but not limited to any department,
agency, authority, commission, board, council, committee, office, task force,
working group, or other body established by or in accordance with the authority of
the laws of such entity.
(3) "Medical intervention" means a medical procedure, treatment, device,
drug, injection, medication, or medical action taken to monitor, diagnose, prevent,
treat, or cure a disease or alter the health or biological function of a person. Medical
interventions include but are not limited to vaccines, biologics, swabs, and tests,
including genetic and genomic testing, pills, capsules, creams, sprays, liquids,
injections, chips, devices, and monitors.
(4) "School" means any public, private, or parochial educational institution,
including preschools and daycares, schools, and postsecondary institutions including
trade schools, colleges, and universities.
§1300.84. Prohibition of medical mandates
A.(1) A business entity shall not deny, restrict, or otherwise penalize any
individual’s access to services, products, venues, education, training, trade, or
transportation based on the individual's refusal of a medical intervention.
(2) The provisions of this Subsection shall not apply to a healthcare facility,
licensed healthcare provider, or healthcare employer.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-716 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1041
B.(1) A business entity shall not require a medical intervention as a condition
of employment.
(2) The provisions of this Subsection shall not apply to a healthcare facility,
licensed healthcare provider, or healthcare employer.
C. A ticket issuer shall not discriminate against or deny access to any person
at an event based on his status with respect to any medical intervention.
D.(1) A school, daycare, or institution of learning shall not mandate a
medical intervention for any person to attend, enter campus or buildings, or be
employed, or to participate in any extracurricular activities, including but not limited
to clubs, performances, arts, or athletics.
(2) A school, daycare, or institution of learning complies with the provisions
of this Part if the school, daycare, or institution of learning complies with the
immunization requirements of R.S. 17:170 et seq. No additional medical intervention
requirement shall be imposed in excess of the requirements of R.S. 17:170 et seq.
E. A government entity or official shall not require a medical intervention
for any of the following:
(1) Access to government services.
(2) Use of public buildings, facilities, infrastructure, or transportation.
(3) Employment by government entities.
F. An individual shall not receive differential compensation, benefits, or
treatment based on their refusal of a medical intervention. However, an employer
may permit an employee to take time off, at his discretion, to voluntarily obtain
medical interventions.
G. Any requirements for medical interventions which are allowed, in
accordance with this Part, shall remain subject to any applicable laws or legal
precedents providing for or protecting exemptions and reasonable accommodations.
H. Personal protective equipment may be required as part of occupational
safety standards, if such requirements are consistent with adopted federal and state
workplace and occupational safety regulations, and do not discriminate based on
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-716 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1041
medical intervention status. An individual shall not be compelled to wear or
otherwise be subjected to personal protective equipment for a specific purpose that
is authorized solely under an emergency use authorization or any similar emergency,
provisional, temporary, or expedited authorization that is contingent upon a declared
emergency or waiver of standard approval requirements.
I. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prevent compliance with child
welfare laws of this state.
J. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prohibit compliance with R.S.
40:31.21 or other applicable laws of this state relating to the control and prevention
of tuberculosis.
§1300.85. Enforcement and remedies
Violations of this Part may be prosecuted by the attorney general or
appropriate parish or municipal prosecutor. If a violation is proven, attorney's fees
and court costs may be awarded.
§1300.86. Non-exclusion of healthy individuals
Under no circumstance shall a healthy individual or alleged asymptomatic
carrier of an illness be excluded from public activities based on the individual having
declined a medical intervention during an outbreak or public health emergency.